Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 3.1. Jail Authorities.

§ 53.1-95.2.
Jail authority.

The governing bodies of two or more counties, cities, or towns or a combination thereof may by concurrent ordinances or resolutions or by agreement, create a jail authority. Such authority shall be subject to all rights, privileges, and obligations contained in Chapter 3 (§

53.1-68

et seq.) of this title.

History.

1990, c. 837; 1992, c. 421.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 568, cl. 2 provides that the membership of regional jail and jail farm boards provided for by §

53.1-106

, regional jail authorities, and jail authorities provided for by Article 3.1 (§

53.1-95.2

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 53.1 established prior to March 25, 1991, and all actions taken by such boards and authorities prior to March 25, 1991, are hereby ratified and confirmed.

§ 53.1-95.3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context indicates another meaning or intent:

“County”
means any county in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“Governing body”
means in the case of a county the board of supervisors and in the case of a city or town the board, commission, council or other body by whatever name it may be known, in which the general legislative powers of the city or town are vested.

“Political subdivision”
means a county, city, or town of the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“Unit”
means any department, institution or commission of the Commonwealth of Virginia and any public corporate instrumentality thereof, and any district, and includes counties and municipalities.

History.

1990, c. 837; 1992, c. 421.

§ 53.1-95.4.
Ordinance, agreement or resolution creating authority.

Each such ordinance, agreement or resolution shall include the following:

The name of the “authority” and address of its principal office.

The name of each participating political subdivision, together with the names, addresses and terms of office of the first members of the board of the authority.

The purpose or purposes for which the authority is to be created together with, insofar as the governing bodies of the participating political subdivisions determine to be practicable, preliminary estimates of capital costs and financing proposals for any specific project or projects to be undertaken by the authority.

The number of members who shall exercise the powers of the authority and the number from each participating political subdivision.

Any such ordinance, agreement or resolution that does not set forth the information required in subdivision A 3 of this section regarding capital cost estimates and project financing proposals shall also set forth a finding that inclusion of such information is impracticable.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.5.
Joinder of new subdivision; withdrawal from authority.

Any political subdivision may become a member of any existing authority, and any political subdivision which is a member of an existing authority may withdraw therefrom, but no political subdivision shall be permitted to withdraw from any authority after any obligation has been incurred by the authority except by unanimous vote of all members of the authority.

The governing body of any political subdivision wishing to withdraw from an existing authority shall signify its desire by resolution or ordinance. The governing body of any political subdivision wishing to become a member of an existing authority and the governing bodies of the political subdivisions then members of the authority shall by concurrent resolutions or ordinances or by agreement provide for the joinder of such political subdivision and specify the number and term of office of members of the expanded authority which are to be appointed by each of the participating political subdivisions, together with the name, address and term of office of initial appointments to membership.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.6.
Governing body.

The powers of the authority shall be exercised by a governing body established in the manner provided in §

53.1-106

.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.7.
Powers of authority.

Each authority created hereunder shall be deemed to be an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions to provide for the public safety and welfare, and each such authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To acquire by gift, purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to hold, to sell, at public or private sale, or exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge, subordinate interest in, or otherwise dispose of real and personal property of every kind and character for its purposes;

To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including a superintendent of the regional correctional facility and necessary jail officers and employees therefor, and also including engineering and construction experts, fiscal agents and attorneys, and to fix their respective compensations;

To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction and financing of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be erected or acquired, and to dispose by conveyance of its title in fee simple of real and personal property of every kind and character, and any and all political subdivisions, departments, institutions, or agencies of the Commonwealth are hereby authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, furnish, operate, and manage projects, the cost of any such project to be paid in whole or in part from the proceeds or other funds made available to the authority;

To accept loans and grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality may impose;

To accept loans and grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the Commonwealth of Virginia or any agency or instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the Commonwealth of Virginia or such agency or instrumentality or political subdivision may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to execute evidences of such indebtedness and to secure the same and to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable solely from funds pledged for that purpose and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof. Any city or county participating in the authority may lend, advance, or give money or materials or property of any kind to the authority;

To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions, which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth;

An authority created pursuant to this article and any trustee acting under any trust indenture are specifically authorized from time to time to sell, lease, grant, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any surplus property, both real and personal, or interest therein not required in the normal operation of and usable in the furtherance of the purpose for which the authority was created, except as such right and power may be limited as provided in §

53.1-95.8

hereof;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded;

To adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with this article or the general laws of the Commonwealth, for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to carry into effect its powers and purposes;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this article.

History.

1990, c. 837; 1994, c. 270.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Qualified law-enforcement officer under federal Act. —

A local or regional jail officer who is not part of a local police or sheriff’s department may meet the definition of a “qualified law enforcement officer” for purposes of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles E. Jett, Sheriff for Stafford County, 05-026 (6/21/05).

§ 53.1-95.8.
Authority of superintendent and jail officers; oath and bond; fees charged to prisoner.

The superintendent appointed by an authority created pursuant to this article to administer its correctional facility shall have and exercise the same control and authority over the prisoners committed or transferred to such facility as the sheriffs of this Commonwealth have by law over the prisoners committed or transferred to their jails.

During the term of their appointment, the superintendent and jail officers are hereby vested with the powers and authority of a conservator of the peace (i) within the limits of such correctional facility and within one mile thereof; (ii) for the purpose of conveying prisoners to and from such facility; (iii) for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of alternative incarceration and treatment programs pursuant to §§

53.1-129

,

53.1-131

, and

53.1-131.2

; (iv) for the purpose of providing security and supervision of prisoners taken to a medical, dental, or psychiatric facility; and (v) for the purpose of providing a security escort and supervision of prisoners transported to a funeral or graveside service. Prisoners may be charged reasonable fees for services described in clause (v).

Before entering upon the duties of their office, the superintendent and jail officers shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed by §

49-1

. An authority created pursuant to this article may require the superintendent or jail officers or both to give bond in such penalty and with such security as the authority may prescribe, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of their offices.

History.

1990, c. 837; 1994, cc. 270, 923, 953; 2002, c. 336; 2004, c. 378.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 336 added the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 378 deleted “and pretrial supervision programs operated pursuant to §

19.2-123

” following “and

53.1-131.2

” in clause (iii) in the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Execution of criminal warrants. —

Officers of a regional jail do not have the authority to execute criminal warrants in the jail. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Roy F. Evans, Jr., Commonwealth’s Attorney for Smyth County, 06-005 (3/22/06).

§ 53.1-95.8:1.
Handling of funds for regional correctional facility; county or city treasurer or director of finance as fiscal agent.

Any authority constituted pursuant to the provisions of this article or Article 1.1 (§

53.1-71.1

et seq.) may appoint as its fiscal agent the treasurer of a county or city which is a member of the authority, or in the case of member jurisdictions where there is no treasurer, the director of finance. No treasurer or director of finance shall be appointed as fiscal agent without their concurrence. In the event such treasurer or director of finance is appointed, all disbursements on behalf of the authority shall be by warrant signed by the chairman of the authority or his designee and countersigned by such treasurer or director of finance as fiscal agent. For his services as fiscal agent, a treasurer or director of finance thus appointed may be paid such salary supplement and reimbursed such expenses as may be agreed upon by the board of the authority and the treasurer or director of finance. Such salary supplement and expenses shall be borne exclusively by the authority and not by the Compensation Board.

History.

1996, c. 623.

§ 53.1-95.9.
Acquisition of interests in land.

An authority created pursuant to this article is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by gift or by lease or purchase solely from funds provided under the provisions of this article such lands, structures, property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction and operation of the project upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof.

All public agencies and the commissions of the Commonwealth, with the approval of the Governor, are hereby authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant, or convey to an authority created pursuant to this article at its request, upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon, without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality, any real property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the authority, including real property already devoted to public use.

Title to any property acquired by an authority created pursuant to this article shall be taken in the name of the authority.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.10.
Issuance of revenue bonds.

An authority created pursuant to this article is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of the project.
The principal of and the interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be fixed by the authority, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds.
The authority shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this article, all such bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the Commonwealth.
The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as both principal and interest and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds.
The authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or negotiated sale, or for such price, as it may determine will best effectuate the purposes of this article.

The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same.
If the proceeds of the bonds of any issuance, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be deemed to be the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued.
If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for such bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery.
The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.
Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this article without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions other than those proceedings or conditions which are specifically required by this article.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall not be deemed to constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof.
All such bonds shall contain a statement on their face substantially to the effect that neither the faith and credit of the Commonwealth nor the faith and credit of any county, city, town, or other subdivision of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds.
The issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this article shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the Commonwealth or any county, city, town, or other subdivision of the Commonwealth to levy any taxes whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment except from the funds pledged under the provisions of this article.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.11.
Trust agreements.

In the discretion of an authority created pursuant to this article, any bonds issued under the provisions of this article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth.
Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the charges and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage the project or any part thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the project, the rates to be charged for services, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys.
It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority.
Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.
In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.
All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the project.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.12.
Charge for use of services.

An authority created pursuant to this article is hereby authorized to fix, revise, and charge for the use of the service furnished by the project and to contract with any unit or department of government at any level, including cities, counties, towns, authorities, regional jail boards, and the state and federal governments and their respective departments, commissions and agencies, desiring the use of any part thereof, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for such use.
Such charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect to the aggregate of the charges from the project as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay (i) the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating such project and (ii) the principal of and interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable and to create reserves for such purposes.
The revenues derived from the project, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided.
Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority.
The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement.
Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.13.
Revenues and proceeds from sale of bonds.

All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. An authority created pursuant to this article may provide for the payment of its revenues to such officer, board, or depository as it may designate for the custody thereof, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine.
The authority shall, in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to a trustee, which shall be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth, which shall act as trustee of the funds, and hold and apply the same to the purposes of this article, subject to such regulations as this article and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.
The trustee may invest and reinvest such funds in such securities as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.14.
Rights of bond holders and trustees.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this article or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given, may be restricted by such trust agreement, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, injunction, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted by this article or under such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this article or by such agreement or resolution to be performed by an authority created pursuant to this article or by any officer or agent thereof including the fixing, charging, and collection of such charges.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.15.
Exemption from taxes.

The exercise of the powers granted by this article shall be in all respects for the benefit of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce, and for the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, convenience, and prosperity, and as the operation and maintenance of the project by an authority created pursuant to this article will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon the project or any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of this article or upon the income therefrom; and the bonds issued under the provisions of this article, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free and exempt from taxation by the Commonwealth and by any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.16.
Issuance of revenue refunding bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of its revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the additional purpose of constructing enlargements, renovations, or improvements of the project.
The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect of the same, shall be governed by the provisions of this article insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.17.
General purpose of an authority.

Without limiting the generality of any provisions of this article, the general purpose of an authority created pursuant to this article is declared to be that of acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating a jail or jail farm and the usual facilities appertaining to such undertakings; enlarging, renovating, and improving such facilities; acquiring the necessary property therefor, both real and personal, with the right of contract for the use of or to lease, mortgage, or sell any or all of such facilities, including real property; and doing any and all things deemed by the authority necessary, convenient, and desirable for and incident to the efficient and proper development and operation of such types of undertakings.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.18.
Design-build contracts.

An authority created pursuant to this article may enter into a contract for a jail on a fixed price or not-to-exceed price design-build basis or construction management basis in accordance with procedures consistent with those described in the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) for procurement of nonprofessional services through competitive negotiation.
The authority may authorize payment to no more than three responsive bidders who are not awarded the design-build contract if the authority determines that such payment is necessary to promote competition.
The authority shall not be required to award a design-build contract to the lowest bidder but may consider price as one factor in evaluating the proposals received.
The authority shall maintain adequate records to allow post-project evaluation by the Commonwealth.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.19.
State reimbursement.

An authority created pursuant to this article shall be eligible to receive state reimbursement for jail construction and operation in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§

53.1-80

et seq.) of this chapter. State reimbursement for the cost of the project shall be made to the authority and shall be determined as if each participating political subdivision in the authority had contributed its pro rata share of such cost.
However, when an authority created pursuant to this article enters into an agreement with one or more political subdivisions not participating in the authority for the purpose of construction and operating a jail, that share of the state reimbursement due to any political subdivision not participating in the authority shall be made directly to such political subdivision in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of this chapter. The Commonwealth shall fund the positions of superintendent, correctional officers, and two-thirds of the salaries of required medical or treatment personnel on a basis approved by the State Compensation Board. Such salaries shall be paid in the manner provided in §

15.2-1609.2

, and such section shall be applicable mutatis mutandis to such superintendent.

The superintendent of the correctional facility shall report on the first day of each month to the Director of the State Department of Corrections to give the record of each prisoner received during the preceding month on blank forms to be furnished by the Director, to state whether the offense for each prisoner is for violation of state law or of city or town ordinance.
The report shall be signed by both the superintendent and chairman of the authority.
Either signer found guilty of willfully falsifying the information contained in such report shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If any superintendent fails to send such report within five days after the date when the report is to be forwarded, the Director shall notify the superintendent of such failure.
If the superintendent fails to make the report within ten days from that date, then the Director shall cause the report to be prepared from the books of the superintendent and shall certify the cost thereof to the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall issue his warrant on the Treasurer for that amount, deducting the same from any funds that may be due the superintendent by the Commonwealth.

History.

1990, c. 837.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Section

15.2-1609.2

, which is referred to near the end of the first paragraph, is effective October 1, 1998. Until that date, the applicable statutory reference is Article 9 (§ 14.1-68 et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 14.1.

§ 53.1-95.20.
Duty to prescribe rules and regulations.

It shall be the duty of an authority created pursuant to this article to prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with standards of the State Board of Local and Regional Jails, for the operation of the project or projects constructed under the provisions of this article.

History.

1990, c. 837; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Local and Regional Jails” for “Corrections.”

§ 53.1-95.21.
Supplemental and additional powers.

The foregoing sections of this article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the performance of acts authorized thereby, shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.22.
Liberal construction.

This article, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.23.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

53.1-95.23

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1990, c. 837.

§ 53.1-95.24.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

All other general or special laws inconsistent with any provision of this article are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this article.

History.

1990, c. 837.